test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-lex_laavu_gt-norm.gen.yaml
  Noun - suánju: # ok; nj is actually one consonant
    suánju+N+Sg+Nom:  suánju
    suánju+N+Sg+Gen:  suánju
    suánju+N+Sg+Acc:  suánju
    suánju+N+Sg+Ill:  suánjun
    suánju+N+Sg+Loc:  suánjust
    suánju+N+Sg+Com:  suánjoin
    suánju+N+Sg+Abe:  suánjuttáá
    suánju+N+Ess:  suánnjun
    suánju+N+Par:  suánnjud
    suánju+N+Pl+Nom:  suánjuh
    suánju+N+Pl+Gen: suánjui
    suánju+N+Pl+Acc:  suánjuid
    suánju+N+Pl+Ill:  suánjoid
    suánju+N+Pl+Loc:  suánjuin
    suánju+N+Pl+Com:  [suánjuiguin, suánjuigijn]
    suánju+N+Pl+Abe:  suánjuittáá

  Noun - moolâ:
    moolâ+N+Sg+Nom: moolâ
    moolâ+N+Sg+Gen: moolâ
    moolâ+N+Sg+Acc: moolâ
    moolâ+N+Sg+Ill: moolân
    moolâ+N+Sg+Loc: moolâst
    moolâ+N+Sg+Com: mooláin
    moolâ+N+Sg+Abe: molâttáá
    moolâ+N+Ess: moollân
    moolâ+N+Par: moollâd
    moolâ+N+Pl+Nom: moolah
    moolâ+N+Pl+Gen: [moolâi, molâi]
    moolâ+N+Pl+Acc: moolâid
    moolâ+N+Pl+Ill: mooláid
    moolâ+N+Pl+Loc: moolâin
    moolâ+N+Pl+Com: [molâiguin, molâigijn]
    moolâ+N+Pl+Abe: molâittáá
        
  Noun - paarâ: # MOOLA
    paarâ+N+Sg+Nom: paarâ
    paarâ+N+Sg+Gen: paarâ
    paarâ+N+Sg+Acc: paarâ
    paarâ+N+Sg+Ill: paarân
    paarâ+N+Sg+Loc: paarâst
    paarâ+N+Sg+Com: paaráin
    paarâ+N+Sg+Abe: parâttáá
    paarâ+N+Ess:    paarrân
    paarâ+N+Par:    paarrâd
    paarâ+N+Pl+Nom: paarah
    paarâ+N+Pl+Gen: [paarâi, parâi]
    paarâ+N+Pl+Acc: paarâid
    paarâ+N+Pl+Ill: paaráid
    paarâ+N+Pl+Loc: paarâin
    paarâ+N+Pl+Com: [parâiguin, parâigijn]
    paarâ+N+Pl+Abe: parâittáá

  
